Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Governor’s Commission on Physical Fitness and Sports

§ 7-1-551.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Commission” means the Governor’s Commission on Physical Fitness and Sports.

“Physical fitness” means good or improved life-style habits of Mississippi residents through the utilization of recreational opportunities, consistent and medically correct exercise, and leisure time management for the expressed purpose of decreasing stress related maladies, thereby promoting a more healthful environment for the citizens of this state.

“Sports” means those team or individual competitive athletic activities that are participated in on an amateur basis by the citizens of the State of Mississippi for the expressed purposes of enjoyment, exercise and sportsmanship without expectations of financial remuneration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-553.
Purpose.

There is hereby created a Governor’s Commission on Physical Fitness and Sports to serve the citizens of the State of Mississippi by developing safe, healthful and enjoyable physical fitness and sports programs. This commission shall provide instruments of motivation, education and shall promote public awareness to assure that all citizens of the State of Mississippi will have the opportunity to pursue a more healthful life-style.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-555.
Membership; reimbursement of travel expenses; terms of service.

The Governor shall appoint twenty-five (25) members, including a chairman, to the commission. The commission members shall be chosen based on their related physical fitness and sports experiences, their education and the areas of expertise that they will contribute to the Governor’s commission without expectation of compensation during their appointed terms. These individual members shall be eligible for reimbursement of travel and expenses in the performance of their appointed duties. The first members of the commission shall be appointed for terms as follows:

Six (6) members shall be appointed for terms of one (1) year each;

Six (6) members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years each;

Six (6) members shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years each;

Six (6) members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years each; and

The chairman shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.

Upon expiration of the aforementioned initial terms, successors to each commission post shall be appointed by the Governor to a four-year term. At the discretion of the Governor, commission appointees shall be eligible for reappointment a second time concurrent to their original term. Subsequent to the second term completion, commission members shall not be eligible to serve again on the commission for a period of one (1) year, at which time eligibility for service to the commission can again be activated at the discretion of the Governor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-557.
Meetings; quorum; dismissal of member; filling vacancy.

At the convenience and discretion of the Governor, the commission shall be called to meet and conduct business on a basis of need as recommended to the Governor by the commission chairman. Nine (9) members shall constitute a quorum. All rules and regulations enacted by the commission shall be subject to amendment by the Governor. Chronic absenteeism, death, sickness and/or apathy toward commission business may result in the dismissal and/or replacement of a commission member by the Governor. The vacancy resulting from such a dismissal and/or death shall be filled by the Governor at his convenience no later than two (2) months after such a vacancy has occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-559.
Funding; annual budget report.

In keeping with the ethics and philosophy of the President’s Council on Physical Fitness and Sports, funding for the Governor’s commission shall be generated primarily on the basis of private sector sponsorship. At no time shall any sponsor and/or commission member be allowed to generate personal and/or corporate profits as a result of its affiliation with the Governor’s Commission on Physical Fitness and Sports. Accountability for all monies secured by the commission shall be subject to the Governor’s review at any time. The commission shall also be responsible for submitting an annual budget report to the Governor reflecting all debits and credits incurred by the commission during a fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-561.
Duties and responsibilities of commission.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of the Governor’s commission to execute to its fullest capacity the following tenets as stated in Presidential Executive Order 12345 of the President’s Council on Physical Fitness and Sports:

Enlist the active support and assistance of individual citizens, civic groups, private enterprise, voluntary organizations and others in an effort to promote and improve the fitness of all Mississippians through regular participation in physical fitness and sports activities.

Initiate programs to inform the general public of the importance of exercise and the link which exists between regular physical activity and such qualities as good health and effective performance.

Strengthen coordination of federal services and programs relating to physical fitness and sports participation and invite appropriate federal agencies to participate in an interagency committee to coordinate physical fitness and sports activities of the federal establishment.

Encourage state agencies and local governments to emphasize the importance of regular physical and sports participation.

Seek to advance the physical fitness of children, youth, adults and senior citizens by systematically encouraging the development of community recreation, physical fitness and sports participation programs.

Develop cooperative programs with medical, dental and other similar professional societies to encourage the implementation of sound physical fitness practices and sports medicine services.

Stimulate and encourage research in the areas of sports medicine, physical fitness and sports performance.

Assist educational agencies at all levels in developing high quality, innovative health and physical education programs which emphasize the importance of exercise for good health.

Assist recreation agencies and state sports governing bodies at all levels in developing “sports for all” programs which emphasize the value of sports to physical, mental and emotional fitness.

Assist business, industry, government and labor organizations in establishing sound physical fitness programs to elevate employee fitness and to reduce the financial and human costs resulting from physical inactivity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-563.
Acceptance of gifts and grants.

The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to accept from the federal government, or any instrumentality thereof, or from any person, firm or corporation in the name of and for the state, services, equipment, supplies, materials or funds by way of gift or grant for the purpose of physical fitness.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-1-565.
Annual report.

The commission shall make an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature, including therein suggestions and recommendations for protecting and improving the physical fitness of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 369, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1992.